Mississippi, session 2026, HB1102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 17-23-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 17-23-21.  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Annual Fire Fund" to be administered by the Commissioner of Insurance.  Except as otherwise required under this section, monies in the fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, may be used by the commissioner only for the purpose of his or her discretion in requesting the State Fiscal Officer, and notifying the Legislative Budget Office of such, to transfer funds from this fund to the Rural Fire Truck Fund, the Supplementary Rural Fire Truck Fund, the Municipal Fire Protection Fund and/or the County Volunteer Fire Department Fund; however, the commissioner shall request the State Fiscal Officer to transfer at least One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00) annually to the Rural and Supplementary Rural Fire Truck Funds.  Further, the commissioner shall request the State Fiscal Officer to transfer an amount not exceeding One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) to the City of Ocean Springs for the purchase of a fire truck during fiscal year 2027.  Upon the request of the commissioner, the State Fiscal Officer shall transfer the requested amounts from the Annual Fire Fund to the Rural Fire Truck Fund, the Supplementary Rural Fire Truck Fund, the Municipal Fire Protection Fund * * * and/or, the County Volunteer Fire Department Fund, or as otherwise required under this section.  The total amount of all such transfers shall not exceed the amount appropriated by the Legislature from the Annual Fire Fund for the fiscal year in which the transfers are made, and those transfers shall not reduce the amount of the spending authority provided to the commissioner by that appropriation.  The commissioner shall document those transfers through a reconciliation with the Department of Finance and Administration.  The Annual Fire Fund shall consist of monies provided to it through the provisions of Section 83-34-4(6), and any monies which may be appropriated to it by the Legislature.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. SECTION 2.  Section 17-23-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 17-23-1.  (1)  There is established the Rural Fire Truck Acquisition Assistance Program to be administered by the Department of Insurance for the purpose of assisting counties and municipalities in the acquisition of fire trucks. (2)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Rural Fire Truck Fund."  The Legislature may appropriate that amount necessary to fulfill the obligations created under this section by the Department of Insurance, from the State General Fund to such special fund, which sum shall be added to the remainder of the money transferred on July 1, 1995, and during the 1996 Regular Session to the Rural Fire Truck Fund.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  Unobligated amounts remaining in the Rural Fire Truck Fund, Fund No. 3507, or in any fund created for funds appropriated or otherwise made available for this program, may be used as matching funds by any county with remaining eligibility as provided herein.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Insurance continue to accept applications from the counties for fire trucks as provided in subsection (3) of this section. (3)  (a)  A county that meets the requirements provided herein may receive an amount not to exceed One Million Ten Thousand Dollars ($1,010,000.00) as provided in subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v), (vi), (vii), (viii), (ix), (x), (xi), (xii) and (xiii) of this paragraph, and such amount shall be divided as follows:  an amount of not more than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per fire truck for the first six (6) trucks and not more than Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per fire truck for the seventh, eighth, ninth, tenth and eleventh trucks, and not more than Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) per fire truck for the twelfth, thirteenth, fourteenth and fifteenth truck.  Monies distributed under this chapter shall be expended only for the purchase of new or used fire trucks and such trucks must meet the National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) standards in the 1900 series and be approved by the Rural Fire Truck Review Committee. (i)  Any county that has not applied for a fire truck under this section is eligible to submit applications for fifteen (15) fire trucks as follows:  six (6) fire trucks at not more than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per truck and five (5) fire trucks at not more than Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per truck, and four (4) fire trucks at not more than Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) per truck or a total of One Million Ten Thousand Dollars ($1,010,000.00). (ii)  Any county that has received one (1) fire truck under this section is eligible to submit applications for fourteen (14) fire trucks as follows:  five (5) fire trucks at not more than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per truck and five (5) fire trucks at not more than Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per truck, and four (4) fire trucks at not more than Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) per truck or a total of Nine Hundred Sixty Thousand Dollars ($960,000.00). (iii)  Any county that has received two (2) fire trucks under this section is eligible to submit an application for thirteen (13) fire trucks as follows:  four (4) fire trucks at not more than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per truck and five (5) fire trucks at not more than Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per truck, and four (4) fire trucks at not more than Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) per truck or a total of not more than Nine Hundred Ten Thousand Dollars ($910,000.00). (iv)  Any county that has received three (3) fire trucks under this section is eligible to submit an application for twelve (12) fire trucks as follows:  three (3) fire trucks at not more than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per truck and five (5) fire trucks at not more than Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per truck, and four (4) fire trucks at not more than Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) per truck or a total of not more than Eight Hundred Sixty Thousand Dollars ($860,000.00). (v)  Any county that has received four (4) fire trucks under this section is eligible to submit an application for eleven (11) fire trucks as follows:  two (2) fire trucks at not more than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per truck and five (5) fire trucks at not more than Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per truck, and four (4) fire trucks at not more than Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) per truck or a total of not more than Eight Hundred Ten Thousand Dollars ($810,000.00). (vi)  Any county that has received five (5) fire trucks under this section is eligible to submit an application for ten (10) fire trucks as follows:  one (1) fire truck at not more than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per truck and five (5) fire trucks at not more than Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per truck, and four (4) fire trucks at not more than Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) per truck or a total of not more than Seven Hundred Sixty Thousand Dollars ($760,000.00). (vii)  Any county that has received six (6) fire trucks under this section is eligible to submit an application for nine (9) fire trucks as follows:  five (5) fire trucks at not more than Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per truck, and four (4) fire trucks at not more than Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) per truck or a total of not more than Seven Hundred Ten Thousand Dollars ($710,000.00). (viii)  Any county that has received seven (7) fire trucks under this section is eligible to submit an application for eight (8) fire trucks as follows:  four (4) fire trucks at not more than Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per truck, and four (4) fire trucks at not more than Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) per truck or a total of not more than Six Hundred Forty Thousand Dollars ($640,000.00). (ix)  Any county that has received eight (8) fire trucks under this section is eligible to submit an application for seven (7) fire trucks as follows:  three (3) fire trucks at not more than Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per truck, and four (4) fire trucks at not more than Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) per truck or a total of not more than Five Hundred Seventy Thousand Dollars ($570,000.00). (x)  Any county that has received nine (9) fire trucks under this section is eligible to submit an application for six (6) fire trucks as follows:  two (2) fire trucks at not more than Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per truck, and four (4) fire trucks at not more than Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) per truck or a total of not more than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00). (xi)  Any county that has received ten (10) fire trucks under this section is eligible to submit an application for five (5) fire trucks as follows:  one (1) fire truck at not more than Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per truck, and four (4) fire trucks at not more than Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) per truck or a total of not more than Four Hundred Thirty Thousand Dollars ($430,000.00). (xii)  Any county that has received eleven (11) fire trucks under this section is eligible to submit an application for four (4) fire trucks at not more than Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) per truck. (xiii)  Any county may apply for four (4) fire trucks at not more than Ninety Thousand Dollars ($90,000.00) per truck as provided in subparagraph (xii), provided that the county agrees to forego any previous fire truck under subparagraphs (i) through (xi) for which the county has not previously applied, and that the county has received approval from the Rural Fire Truck Acquisition Assistance Program Committee to apply for and receive a truck under subparagraph (xii). (b)  The board of supervisors of the county shall submit its request for the receipt of monies to the Department of Insurance.  A committee composed of the Commissioner of Insurance, the State Fire Coordinator, the Director of the Rating Bureau and the Director of the State Fire Academy shall review the requests by the boards of supervisors and shall determine whether the county or municipality for which the board of supervisors has requested a truck meets the requirements of eligibility under this chapter. (c)  To be eligible to receive monies under this chapter: (i)  A county or municipality must pledge to set aside or dedicate each year as matching funds, for a period not to extend over ten (10) years, local funds in an amount equal to or not less than one-tenth (1/10) of the amount of monies for which it is requesting distribution from the Rural Fire Truck Fund, which pledged monies may be derived from local ad valorem tax authorized by law or from any other funds available to the county or municipality, except for those funds received by municipalities or counties from the Municipal Fire Protection Fund or the County Volunteer Fire Department Fund, as defined in Sections 83-1-37 and 83-1-39. (ii)  A municipality must provide adequate documentation of its contract with the county that requires the municipality to provide fire protection in rural areas.  The term "rural areas" means any area within the county located outside the boundaries of an incorporated municipality or any incorporated municipality with a population of two thousand five hundred (2,500) or less. (d)  The Department of Insurance shall maintain an accurate record of all monies distributed to counties and municipalities and the number of fire trucks purchased and the cost for each fire truck, such records to be kept separate from other records of the Department of Insurance; notify counties and municipalities of the Rural Fire Truck Acquisition Assistance Program and the requirements for them to become eligible to participate; adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary and desirable to implement the provisions of this chapter; and file with the Legislature a report detailing how monies made available under this chapter were distributed and spent during the preceding portion of the fiscal year in each county and municipality, the number of fire trucks purchased, the counties and municipalities making such purchases, and the cost of each fire truck purchased. (4)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Rural Fire Truck Matching Assistance Fund," which shall consist of funds appropriated by the Legislature from the State General Fund or any other special source fund. The Department of Insurance shall use the funds for matching assistance to counties and municipalities with remaining eligibility in accordance with the provisions of subsection (5) of this section.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. (5)  Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the Department of Insurance may provide funds to counties and municipalities out of the Rural Fire Truck Matching Assistance Fund in an amount exceeding the amount authorized in subsection (3) of this section.  However, the total amount of funds allowed under this subsection combined with the funds provided in subsection (3) of this section shall not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the purchase price of the rural fire truck.  A county or municipality is eligible for such matching assistance upon meeting the following criteria: (a)  The county or municipality's application is approved for funding in accordance with the criteria in subsection (3) of this section; (b)  The department determines that the county or municipality does not have sufficient funds available for the purchase of a rural fire truck with the funds authorized in subsection (3) of this section; and (c)  The county has received funding for no more than eight (8) rounds from the Rural Fire Truck Acquisition Assistance Program. SECTION 3.  Section 17-23-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 17-23-11.  (1)  There is established a supplementary rural fire truck acquisition assistance program to be administered by the Department of Insurance for the purpose of assisting counties and municipalities in the acquisition of fire trucks.  The supplementary rural fire truck acquisition assistance program is in addition to the rural fire truck acquisition assistance program established in Section 17-23-1 or any other program by which counties and municipalities acquire fire trucks. (2)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Supplementary Rural Fire Truck Fund" which shall consist of funds appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislature in any manner, and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  Monies in the fund shall be used for the purpose of assisting counties and municipalities in the acquisition of fire trucks.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. (3)  (a)  A county that meets the requirements provided herein may receive an amount of not more than Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per fire truck.  Monies distributed under this section shall be expended only for the purchase of new fire trucks and such trucks must meet the National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) standards in the 1900 series. (b)  The board of supervisors of the county shall submit its request for the receipt of monies to the Department of Insurance.  A committee composed of the Commissioner of Insurance, the State Fire Coordinator, the Director of the Rating Bureau and the Director of the State Fire Academy shall review the requests by the boards of supervisors and shall determine whether the county or municipality for which the board of supervisors has requested a truck meets the requirements of eligibility under this section. (c)  To be eligible to receive monies under this section: (i)  A county or municipality must pledge to set aside or dedicate each year as matching funds, for a period not to extend over ten (10) years, local funds in an amount equal to or not less than one-tenth (1/10) of the amount of monies for which it is requesting distribution from the Supplementary Rural Fire Truck Fund, which pledged monies may be derived from local ad valorem tax authorized by law or from any other funds available to the county or municipality, except for those funds received by municipalities or counties from the Municipal Fire Protection Fund or the County Volunteer Fire Department Fund, as defined in Sections 83-1-37 and 83-1-39. (ii)  A municipality must provide adequate documentation of its contract with the county that requires the municipality to provide fire protection in rural areas.  The term "rural areas" means any area within the county located outside the boundaries of an incorporated municipality or any incorporated municipality with a population of two thousand five hundred (2,500) or less. (iii)  A county or a municipality, designated by the county, must have exhausted all rounds of applications for fire trucks available to it under Section 17-23-1. (d)  The Department of Insurance shall maintain an accurate record of all monies distributed to counties and municipalities and the number of fire trucks purchased and the cost for each fire truck, such records to be kept separate from other records of the Department of Insurance; notify counties and municipalities of the supplementary rural fire truck acquisition assistance program and the requirements for them to become eligible to participate; adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary and desirable to implement the provisions of this section; and file with the Legislature a report detailing how monies made available under this chapter were distributed and spent during the preceding portion of the fiscal year in each county and municipality, the number of fire trucks purchased, the counties and municipalities making such purchases and the cost of each fire truck purchased. SECTION 4.  Section 83-1-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-1-37.  (1)  The Department of Revenue shall pay for credit to a fund known as the "Municipal Fire Protection Fund," the sum of Four Million Eight Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($4,850,000.00) annually out of the insurance premium tax collected annually from the taxes levied on the gross premiums on fire insurance policies written on properties in this state, under Sections 27-15-103 through 27-15-127.  The State Treasurer shall credit this amount to the Municipal Fire Protection Fund.  This fund shall be set aside and earmarked for payment to municipalities in this state, as hereinafter provided. (2)  Using 1990 as a base year, the Department of Revenue shall pay over annually to the State Treasurer, for credit to the "Municipal Fire Protection Fund," an amount representing one-half of ten percent (1/2 of 10%) of any growth after 1990 of the insurance premium tax collected annually from the taxes levied on the gross premium on fire insurance policies written on properties in this state, under Sections 27-15-103 through 27-15-127. (3)  The fund hereby created and denominated "Municipal Fire Protection Fund" shall be apportioned and paid over by the Department of Insurance to the incorporated municipalities certified as eligible to participate in the fund by the Commissioner of Insurance, and shall be distributed in the following manner annually:  each municipality shall be paid Six Thousand Dollars ($6,000.00), with the remainder of the monies to be paid on a population basis, to be determined by the most recent federal census.  Municipalities receiving these funds shall earmark such monies for fire protection services. (4)  The amount paid under subsections (1) and (2) of this section to a municipality shall be used and expended in accordance with the guidelines established by the Commissioner of Insurance authorized by Section 45-11-7, for the training of municipal personnel as needed for the adoption of and compliance with the minimum building codes as established and promulgated by the Mississippi Building Codes Council, for windstorm mitigation programs as approved by the Commissioner of Insurance, and for emergency medical service training and equipment as provided by municipal fire protection services.  A municipality may provide reasonable remuneration to municipal volunteer firefighters in accordance with the guidelines established by the Commissioner of Insurance authorized by Section 45-11-7. (5)  Each municipality shall levy a tax of not less than one-fourth (1/4) mill on all property of the municipality or appropriate the avails of not less than one-fourth (1/4) mill from the municipality's general fund for fire protection purposes. Municipalities may allow such millage to be collected by the county.  Each municipality shall annually provide the Commissioner of Insurance and the State Fire Coordinator on a form provided by the State Fire Coordinator a report stating whether the municipality is levied the one-fourth (1/4) mill hereby required or in lieu thereof is allowing such millage to be collected by the county. (6)  The Commissioner of Insurance may promulgate rules and regulations to establish guidelines for the use of fire rebate funds. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.